Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.090

Quorum.

A majority of the members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and carrying out the duties of the commission: PROVIDED, That on all fiscal matters, approval for passage must be by at least two-thirds majority of the said quorum.

[ 1969 c 129 s 9.]